District of Columbia statutes.
47-2841

Exposing persons or animals as targets prohibited.

No person shall set up, operate, or conduct any business or device by or in which any person, animal, or living object shall act or be exposed as a target for any ball, projectile, missile, or thing thrown or projected for or in consideration of profit or gain, directly or indirectly.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 44
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 562, ch. 366
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2841.
1973 Ed., § 47-2343.